New York, session 2025-2026, A9430.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 153 of the executive law, as added by a chapter of 2 the laws of 2025 amending the executive law relating to providing tech- 3 nical assistance to any municipality that has had a college or universi- 4 ty close within such municipality, as proposed in legislative bills 5 numbers S. 1525 and A. 2007, is REPEALED. 6 § 2. The economic development law is amended by adding a new section 7 12 to read as follows: 8 § 12. Technical assistance to municipalities related to college and 9 university closures. The department shall provide to any municipality, 10 upon request, technical assistance in the event of a college or univer- 11 sity closing in such municipality, on topics including but not limited 12 to: 13 1. workforce transition and development; 14 2. attracting new employers and economic opportunities; 15 3. developing plans for the land and buildings formerly occupied by 16 such college or university; and 17 4. recommendations and planning assistance for dealing with creditors 18 and other entities having a financial interest in such college or 19 university's assets located in such municipality, provided, however, 20 that the state shall not become a party to any legal proceedings pursu- 21 ant to this section. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 23 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the executive law 24 relating to providing technical assistance to any municipality that has 25 had a college or university close within such municipality, as proposed 26 in legislative bills numbers S. 1525 and A. 2007, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03552-02-6